Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.120

Grant exclusive.

Every person licensed to keep a ferry under the provisions of RCW 36.53.010 through 36.53.140 shall have the exclusive privilege of transporting all persons and property over and across the stream where the ferry is established, and shall be entitled to all the fare arising by law therefrom: PROVIDED, That any person may cross such stream at the ferry location in his or her own boat, or take in and carry over his or her neighbor, when done without fee or charge, and not with intent to injure the person licensed to keep a ferry.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4090; 1963 c 4 s 36.53.120. Prior: Code 1881 s 3013; 1879 p 63 s 49; 1869 p 283 s 51; 1863 p 524 s 11; 1854 p 356 s 11; RRS s 5473.]